Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska54-2933
Regulated article, defined.

Regulated article means any item capable of transmitting a dangerous disease including conveyances, equipment, feed, or any other item established by the department.

Laws 2020, LB344, § 33.